hu: Sportsapka stílusa: 5 paneles; Baseball sapka; Kadét sapka; Kerek sapka; Dad cap; Fitted (zárt hátú); Sildes sapka; Flex fit; Funkcionális sapka; Versenysapka; Snapback; Strapback; Kamionos sapka; Napellenző; Egyéb
ro-RO: Stilul șepcii sport: 5 panouri; Șapcă de baseball; Șapcă de cadet; Șapcă de camper; Șapcă dad; Pe mărime; Șapcă plată; Flex fit; Șapcă de performanță; Șapcă de curse; Snapback; Strapback; Șapcă trucker; Cozoroc; Altele
da: Stil for sportskasket: 5-panel; Baseballkasket; Kadetkasket; Camperkasket; Dad cap; Fitted; Flat cap; Flexfit; Performance-kasket; Racing-kasket; Snapback; Strapback; Truckerkasket; Solskærm; Andet
cs: Styl sportovní čepice: Pětipanelová; Baseballová kšiltovka; Kšiltovka cadet; Kšiltovka camper; Kšiltovka dad; Fitted; Bekovka; Flexfit; Funkční kšiltovka; Závodní kšiltovka; Snapback; Strapback; Kšiltovka trucker; Kšilt; Jiné
pt-BR: Estilo do boné esportivo: 5 panel; Boné de beisebol; Boné cadete; Boné camper; Dad hat; Fechado; Boina; Flexfit; Boné de desempenho; Boné de corrida; Snapback; Strapback; Boné trucker; Viseira; Outro
zh-CN: 运动帽款式: 5 片式; 棒球帽; 平顶军帽; 露营帽; 老爹帽; 全封闭帽; 鸭舌帽; 弹性贴合帽; 运动机能帽; 赛车帽; 平沿按扣帽; 调节带帽; 卡车司机帽; 空顶帽; 其他
fi: Urheilulippalakin tyyli: 5-paneelinen; Lippalakki; Cadet-lippis; Camper-lippis; Dad-lippis; Fitted-lippis; Flat cap; Flexfit-lippis; Urheilulippis; Ajolippis; Snapback; Strapback; Trucker-lippis; Aurinkolippa; Muu
fr: Type de casquette de sport: 5 pans; Casquette de baseball; Casquette militaire; Casquette camper; Casquette souple; Ajustée; Casquette plate; Flexible; Casquette de performance; Casquette de course; Snapback; Strapback; Casquette trucker; Visière; Autre
hr-HR: Stil sportske kape: S 5 panela; Šilterica; Kadetska kapa; Kamperska kapa; Dad kapa; Fitted; Ravna kapa; Flex fit; Performance kapa; Trkaća kapa; Snapback; Strapback; Trucker kapa; Šilt; Ostalo
es: Estilo de la gorra deportiva: 5 paneles; Gorra de béisbol; Gorra cadete; Gorra camper; Gorra dad; Ajustada; Gorra plana; Ajuste flexible; Gorra de rendimiento; Gorra de carreras; Snapback; Strapback; Gorra de camionero; Visera; Otro
sl-SI: Stil športne kape: S 5 paneli; Kapa s ščitnikom; Vojaška kapa; Taborniška kapa; »Dad cap« (kapa s ščitnikom); Po meri; Ploska kapa; Raztegljiva (flex fit); Športna kapa (Performance); Dirkalna kapa; Snapback; Strapback; Trakerska kapa; Ščitnik za sonce; Drugo
sk-SK: Štýl športovej čiapky: 5-panelová; Bejzbalová šiltovka; Kadetská čiapka; Kempingová čiapka; Šiltovka typu dad cap; Presná veľkosť (fitted); Baretka/plochá čiapka; Elastická (flex fit); Funkčná šiltovka; Pretekárska šiltovka; Snapback; Strapback; Šiltovka trucker; Šilt; Iné
nl: Sportpet stijl: 5-panel; Honkbalpet; Cadet-cap; Camper-cap; Dad-cap; Fitted; Platte pet; Flex fit; Prestatiepet; Racepet; Snapback; Strapback; Truckerpet; Zonneklep; Overige
ru: Стиль спортивной кепки: 5-панельная; Бейсболка; Кепка-кадетка; Кепка-кемпер; Кепка dad hat; По размеру головы (Fitted); Кепка с плоским козырьком; С эластичной лентой (Flexfit); Спортивная кепка; Гоночная кепка; Снэпбэк (Snapback); Кепка с ремешком (Strapback); Кепка тракер; Козырек; Другая
pt-PT: Estilo do boné desportivo: 5 painéis; Boné de basebol; Boné cadete; Boné de campismo; Boné dad; À medida; Boné plano; Ajuste elástico; Boné de desempenho; Boné de corrida; Snapback; Strapback; Boné de camionista; Viseira; Outro
sv: Sportkepsstil: 5-panels; Baseballkeps; Kadettkeps; Camperkeps; Dad-keps; Fitted; Gubbkeps; Flexfit; Funktionskeps; Racingkeps; Snapback; Strapback; Truckerkeps; Skärm; Övrigt
ja: スポーツキャップスタイル: 5パネル; ベースボールキャップ; カデットキャップ; キャンパーキャップ; ダッドキャップ; フィッテッド; フラットキャップ; フレックスフィット; パフォーマンスキャップ; レーシングキャップ; スナップバック; ストラップバック; トラッカーキャップ; サンバイザー; その他
lt-LT: Sportinės kepurės tipas: 5 dalių; Beisbolo kepuraitė; Kariško stiliaus kepuraitė; Stovyklautojo kepuraitė; Tėčio kepuraitė; Prigludusi; Plokščia kepuraitė; „Flex fit“; Funkcinė kepuraitė; Lenktynių kepuraitė; Kepurė su reguliuojamu užsegimu („Snapback“); Su dirželiu („Strapback“); Tinklinė kepurė („Trucker“); Skydelis nuo saulės; Kita
zh-TW: 運動帽樣式: 五片帽; 棒球帽; 軍帽; 露營帽; 老帽; 全封帽; 鴨舌帽; 彈性帽; 運動機能帽; 賽車帽; 後扣帽; 後調帽; 網帽; 遮陽帽; 其他
th: สไตล์หมวกกีฬา: 5 ชิ้น; หมวกเบสบอล; หมวกทรงทหาร; หมวกแคมป์เปอร์; หมวกทรงแดดแฮท; หมวกฟิตเต็ด; หมวกทรงแบน; หมวกเฟล็กซ์ฟิต; หมวกเพอร์ฟอร์มานซ์; หมวกเรซซิ่ง; สแนปแบ็ก; สแตรปแบ็ก; หมวกทรัคเกอร์; หมวกไวเซอร์; อื่นๆ
vi: Kiểu mũ thể thao: 5 vành (5-panel); Mũ bóng chày; Mũ quân đội; Mũ cắm trại; Mũ lưỡi trai mềm; Bo khít (Fitted); Mũ nồi; Vừa vặn co giãn (Flex fit); Mũ thể thao; Mũ đua; Mũ Snapback; Mũ Strapback; Mũ Trucker; Mũ nửa đầu (Visor); Khác
en: Sports cap style: 5-panel; Baseball cap; Cadet cap; Camper cap; Dad cap; Fitted; Flat cap; Flex fit; Performance cap; Racing cap; Snapback; Strapback; Trucker cap; Visor; Other
el: Στυλ αθλητικού καπέλου: 5-panel; Καπέλο baseball; Καπέλο cadet; Καπέλο camper; Καπέλο dad; Fitted; Τραγιάσκα; Flex fit; Αθλητικό καπέλο; Καπέλο racing; Snapback; Strapback; Καπέλο trucker; Γείσο; Άλλο
it: Stile del cappellino sportivo: 5 pannelli; Cappellino da baseball; Cappellino cadet; Cappellino camper; Dad cap; Fitted; Berretto piatto; Flexfit; Cappellino tecnico; Cappellino da corsa; Snapback; Strapback; Trucker cap; Visiera; Altro
bg-BG: Стил на спортна шапка: 5-панелна; Бейзболна шапка; Кадетска шапка; Къмпинг шапка; Dad cap; По мярка; Плоска шапка; Flex fit; Спортна шапка; Състезателна шапка; Снапбек; Страпбек; Тракър шапка; Козирка; Друго
tr: Spor şapka stili: 5 panelli; Beyzbol şapkası; Kadet şapkası; Kampçı şapkası; Baba şapkası; Sabit bedenli; Kasket; Esnek kesim; Performans şapkası; Yarış şapkası; Snapback; Strapback; Kamyoncu şapkası; Siperlik; Diğer
de: Stil der Sportkappe: 5-Panel; Baseballkappe; Cadet-Cap; Camper-Cap; Dad-Cap; Fitted; Flat-Cap; Flexfit; Performance-Cap; Racing-Cap; Snapback; Strapback; Trucker-Cap; Visor; Sonstige
pl: Styl czapki sportowej: 5-panelowa; Bejsbolówka; Patrolówka; Czapka typu camper; Dad hat; Fitted; Kaszkiet; Flexfit; Czapka sportowa; Czapka wyścigowa; Snapback; Strapback; Czapka truckerka; Daszek; Inne
ko: 스포츠 캡 방식: 5패널; 야구 모자; 카뎃 모자; 캠퍼 모자; 대드 캡; 피티드; 플랫 캡; 플렉스 핏; 기능성 모자; 레이싱 모자; 스냅백; 스트랩백; 트러커 모자; 바이저; 기타
nb: Sportskaps-stil: 5-panelers; Baseballcaps; Kadettcaps; Camper-caps; Dad-caps; Fitted-caps; Flat caps; Flexfit; Treningscaps; Racingcaps; Snapback; Strapback; Truckercaps; Solskjerm; Annet